Ohio, session 136, HB689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 109.57, 109.573, 109.60, 2953.32, and 5122.311 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 109.57. (A)(1) The superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall procure from wherever procurable and file for record photographs, pictures, descriptions, fingerprints, measurements, and other information that may be pertinent of all persons who have been convicted of committing within this state a felony, any crime constituting a misdemeanor on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, or any misdemeanor described in division (A)(1)(a), (A)(4)(a), or (A)(6)(a) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, or an offense for which the person was arrested, of all children under eighteen years of age who have been adjudicated delinquent children for committing within this state an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult or who have been convicted of or pleaded guilty to committing within this state a felony or an offense of violence, and of all well-known and habitual criminals. The person in charge of any county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution and the person in charge of any state institution having custody of a person suspected of having committed a felony, any crime constituting a misdemeanor on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, or any misdemeanor described in division (A)(1)(a), (A)(4)(a), or (A)(6)(a) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, or an offense for which the person was arrested if the person was not previously fingerprinted for that offense, or having custody of a child under eighteen years of age with respect to whom there is probable cause to believe that the child may have committed an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult shall furnish such material to the superintendent of the bureau. Fingerprints, photographs, or other descriptive information of a child who is under eighteen years of age, has not been arrested or otherwise taken into custody for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence who is not in any other category of child specified in this division, if committed by an adult, has not been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, has not been convicted of or pleaded guilty to committing a felony or an offense of violence, and is not a child with respect to whom there is probable cause to believe that the child may have committed an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult shall not be procured by the superintendent or furnished by any person in charge of any county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution, except as authorized in section 2151.313 of the Revised Code. (2) Every clerk of a court of record in this state, other than the supreme court or a court of appeals, shall send electronically submit in the manner prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau to the superintendent of the bureau a weekly report containing a summary of each case involving a felony, involving any crime constituting a misdemeanor on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, involving a misdemeanor described in division (A)(1)(a), (A)(4)(a), or (A)(6)(a) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, involving a case where a person was fingerprinted upon arrest and charged, or involving an adjudication in a case in which a child under eighteen years of age was alleged to be a delinquent child for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult. The clerk of the court of common pleas shall include in the report and summary the clerk sends under this division all information described in divisions (A)(2)(a) to (f) of this section regarding a case before the court of appeals that is served by that clerk. The summary shall be written on the standard forms furnished submitted in the form and manner prescribed by the superintendent pursuant to division (B) of this section and shall include the following information: (a) The incident tracking number contained on the standard forms furnished by the superintendent pursuant to division (B) of this section assigned to the person or child at the time of being fingerprinted; (b) The style and number of the case; (c) The date of arrest, offense, summons, or arraignment; (d) The date that the person was convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense, adjudicated a delinquent child for committing the act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, found not guilty of the offense, or found not to be a delinquent child for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, the date of an entry dismissing the charge, an entry declaring a mistrial of the offense in which the person is discharged, an entry finding that the person or child is not competent to stand trial, or an entry of a nolle prosequi, or the date of any other determination that constitutes final resolution of the case; (e) A statement of the original charge with the section of the Revised Code that was alleged to be violated; (f) If the person or child was convicted, pleaded guilty, or was adjudicated a delinquent child, the sentence or terms of probation imposed or any other disposition of the offender or the delinquent child. If the offense involved the disarming of a law enforcement officer or an attempt to disarm a law enforcement officer, the clerk shall clearly state that fact in the summary, and the superintendent shall ensure that a clear statement of that fact is placed in the bureau's records. (3)(3)(a) The superintendent shall cooperate with and assist sheriffs, chiefs of police, and other law enforcement officers in the establishment of a complete system of criminal identification and in obtaining fingerprints and other means of identification of all persons arrested on a charge of a felony, any crime constituting a misdemeanor on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, or a misdemeanor described in division (A)(1)(a), (A)(4)(a), or (A)(6)(a) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and of all children under eighteen years of age arrested or otherwise taken into custody for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult. The superintendent shall prepare, maintain, and publish an accurate list of offenses reportable under division (A)(2) of this section, and provide training regarding the proper methods of reporting fingerprints and dispositions to the bureau. (b) The superintendent also shall file for record the fingerprint impressions of all persons confined in a county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution for the violation of state laws and of all children under eighteen years of age who are confined in a county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution or in any facility for delinquent children for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, and any other information that the superintendent may receive from law enforcement officials of the state and its political subdivisions. (4) The superintendent shall carry out Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code with respect to the registration of persons who are convicted of or plead guilty to a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense and with respect to all other duties imposed on the bureau under that chapter. (5) The bureau shall perform centralized recordkeeping functions for criminal history records and services in this state for purposes of the national crime prevention and privacy compact set forth in section 109.571 of the Revised Code and is the criminal history record repository as defined in that section for purposes of that compact. The superintendent or the superintendent's designee is the compact officer for purposes of that compact and shall carry out the responsibilities of the compact officer specified in that compact. (6) The superintendent shall, upon request, assist a county coroner in the identification of a deceased person through the use of fingerprint impressions obtained pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section or collected pursuant to section 109.572 or 311.41 of the Revised Code. (B) The superintendent shall prepare and furnish to every county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution and to every clerk of a court in this state specified in division (A)(2) of this section standard forms for reporting the information required under division (A) of this section. The standard forms that the superintendent prepares pursuant to this division may be in a tangible format, in an electronic format, or in both tangible formats and electronic formats. (C)(1) The superintendent may operate a center for electronic, automated, or other data processing for the storage and retrieval of information, data, and statistics pertaining to criminals and to children under eighteen years of age who are adjudicated delinquent children for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, criminal activity, crime prevention, law enforcement, and criminal justice, and may establish and operate a statewide communications network to be known as the Ohio law enforcement gateway to gather and disseminate information, data, and statistics for the use of law enforcement agencies and for other uses specified in this division. The superintendent may gather, store, retrieve, and disseminate information, data, and statistics that pertain to children who are under eighteen years of age and that are gathered pursuant to sections 109.57 to 109.61 of the Revised Code together with information, data, and statistics that pertain to adults and that are gathered pursuant to those sections. (2) The superintendent or the superintendent's designee shall gather information of the nature described in division (C)(1) of this section that pertains to the offense and delinquency history of a person who has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense for inclusion in the state registry of sex offenders and child-victim offenders maintained pursuant to division (A)(1) of section 2950.13 of the Revised Code and in the internet database operated pursuant to division (A)(13) of that section and for possible inclusion in the internet database operated pursuant to division (A)(11) of that section. (3) In addition to any other authorized use of information, data, and statistics of the nature described in division (C)(1) of this section, the superintendent or the superintendent's designee may provide and exchange the information, data, and statistics pursuant to the national crime prevention and privacy compact as described in division (A)(5) of this section. (4) The Ohio law enforcement gateway shall contain the name, confidential address, and telephone number of program participants in the address confidentiality program established under sections 111.41 to 111.47 of the Revised Code. (5) The attorney general may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing guidelines for the operation of and participation in the Ohio law enforcement gateway. The rules may include criteria for granting and restricting access to information gathered and disseminated through the Ohio law enforcement gateway. The attorney general shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that grant access to information in the gateway regarding an address confidentiality program participant under sections 111.41 to 111.47 of the Revised Code to only chiefs of police, village marshals, county sheriffs, county prosecuting attorneys, and a designee of each of these individuals. The attorney general shall permit an office of a county coroner, the state medical board, and board of nursing to access and view, but not alter, information gathered and disseminated through the Ohio law enforcement gateway. The attorney general may appoint a steering committee to advise the attorney general in the operation of the Ohio law enforcement gateway that is comprised of persons who are representatives of the criminal justice agencies in this state that use the Ohio law enforcement gateway and is chaired by the superintendent or the superintendent's designee. (D)(1) The following are not public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code: (a) Information and materials furnished to the superintendent pursuant to division (A) of this section; (b) Information, data, and statistics gathered or disseminated through the Ohio law enforcement gateway pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section; (c) Information and materials furnished to any board or person under division (F) or (G) of this section. (2) The superintendent or the superintendent's designee shall gather and retain information so furnished under division (A) of this section that pertains to the offense and delinquency history of a person who has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing a sexually oriented offense or a child-victim oriented offense for the purposes described in division (C)(2) of this section. (E)(1) The attorney general shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and subject to division (E)(2) of this section, setting forth the procedure by which a person may receive or release information gathered by the superintendent pursuant to division (A) of this section. A reasonable fee may be charged for this service. If a temporary employment service submits a request for a determination of whether a person the service plans to refer to an employment position has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense listed or described in division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, the request shall be treated as a single request and only one fee shall be charged. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (E)(3) or (4) of this section, a rule adopted under division (E)(1) of this section may provide only for the release of information gathered pursuant to division (A) of this section that relates to the conviction of a person, or a person's plea of guilty to, a criminal offense or to the arrest of a person as provided in division (E)(3) of this section. The superintendent shall not release, and the attorney general shall not adopt any rule under division (E)(1) of this section that permits the release of, any information gathered pursuant to division (A) of this section that relates to an adjudication of a child as a delinquent child, or that relates to a criminal conviction of a person under eighteen years of age if the person's case was transferred back to a juvenile court under division (B)(2) or (3) of section 2152.121 of the Revised Code and the juvenile court imposed a disposition or serious youthful offender disposition upon the person under either division, unless either of the following applies with respect to the adjudication or conviction: (a) The adjudication or conviction was for a violation of section 2903.01 or 2903.02 of the Revised Code. (b) The adjudication or conviction was for a sexually oriented offense, the juvenile court was required to classify the child a juvenile offender registrant for that offense under section 2152.82, 2152.83, or 2152.86 of the Revised Code, that classification has not been removed, and the records of the adjudication or conviction have not been sealed or expunged pursuant to sections 2151.355 to 2151.358 or sealed or expunged pursuant to section 2953.32 of the Revised Code. (3) A rule adopted under division (E)(1) of this section may provide for the release of information gathered pursuant to division (A) of this section that relates to the arrest of a person who is eighteen years of age or older when the person has not been convicted as a result of that arrest if any of the following applies: (a) The arrest was made outside of this state. (b) A criminal action resulting from the arrest is pending, and the superintendent confirms that the criminal action has not been resolved at the time the criminal records check is performed. (c) The bureau cannot reasonably determine whether a criminal action resulting from the arrest is pending, and not more than one year has elapsed since the date of the arrest. (4) A rule adopted under division (E)(1) of this section may provide for the release of information gathered pursuant to division (A) of this section that relates to an adjudication of a child as a delinquent child if not more than five years have elapsed since the date of the adjudication, the adjudication was for an act that would have been a felony if committed by an adult, the records of the adjudication have not been sealed or expunged pursuant to sections 2151.355 to 2151.358 of the Revised Code, and the request for information is made under division (F) of this section or under section 109.572 of the Revised Code. In the case of an adjudication for a violation of the terms of community control or supervised release, the five-year period shall be calculated from the date of the adjudication to which the community control or supervised release pertains. (F)(1) As used in division (F)(2) of this section, "head start agency" means an entity in this state that has been approved to be an agency for purposes of subchapter II of the "Community Economic Development Act," 95 Stat. 489 (1981), 42 U.S.C.A. 9831, as amended. (2)(a) In addition to or in conjunction with any request that is required to be made under section 109.572, 2151.86, 3301.32, 3301.541, division (C) of section 3310.58, or section 3319.39, 3319.391, 3327.10, 3740.11, 5103.053, 5104.013, 5123.081, or 5153.111 of the Revised Code or that is made under section 3314.41, 3319.392, 3326.25, or 3328.20 of the Revised Code, the board of education of any school district; the director of developmental disabilities; any county board of developmental disabilities; any provider or subcontractor as defined in section 5123.081 of the Revised Code; the chief administrator of any chartered nonpublic school; the chief administrator of a registered private provider that is not also a chartered nonpublic school; the chief administrator of any home health agency; the chief administrator of or person operating any child care center, type A family child care home, or type B family child care home licensed under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code; the chief administrator of or person operating any authorized private before and after school care program; the chief administrator of any head start agency; the executive director of a public children services agency; the operator of a residential facility, as defined in section 2151.46 of the Revised Code; a private company described in section 3314.41, 3319.392, 3326.25, or 3328.20 of the Revised Code; or an employer described in division (J)(2) of section 3327.10 of the Revised Code may request that the superintendent of the bureau investigate and determine, with respect to any individual who has applied for employment in any position after October 2, 1989, or any individual wishing to apply for employment with a board of education may request, with regard to the individual, whether the bureau has any information gathered under division (A) of this section that pertains to that individual. On receipt of the request, subject to division (E)(2) of this section, the superintendent shall determine whether that information exists and, upon request of the person, board, or entity requesting information, also shall request from the federal bureau of investigation any criminal records it has pertaining to that individual. The superintendent or the superintendent's designee also may request criminal history records from other states or the federal government pursuant to the national crime prevention and privacy compact set forth in section 109.571 of the Revised Code. Within thirty days of the date that the superintendent receives a request, subject to division (E)(2) of this section, the superintendent shall send to the board, entity, or person a report of any information that the superintendent determines exists, including information contained in records that have been sealed under section 2953.32 of the Revised Code, and, within thirty days of its receipt, subject to division (E)(2) of this section, shall send the board, entity, or person a report of any information received from the federal bureau of investigation, other than information the dissemination of which is prohibited by federal law. (b) When a board of education or a registered private provider is required to receive information under this section as a prerequisite to employment of an individual pursuant to division (C) of section 3310.58 or section 3319.39 of the Revised Code, it may accept a certified copy of records that were issued by the bureau of criminal identification and investigation and that are presented by an individual applying for employment with the district in lieu of requesting that information itself. In such a case, the board shall accept the certified copy issued by the bureau in order to make a photocopy of it for that individual's employment application documents and shall return the certified copy to the individual. In a case of that nature, a district or provider only shall accept a certified copy of records of that nature within one year after the date of their issuance by the bureau. (c) Notwithstanding division (F)(2)(a) of this section, in the case of a request under section 3319.39, 3319.391, or 3327.10 of the Revised Code only for criminal records maintained by the federal bureau of investigation, the superintendent shall not determine whether any information gathered under division (A) of this section exists on the person for whom the request is made. (3) The state board of education or the department of education and workforce may request, with respect to any individual who has applied for employment after October 2, 1989, in any position with the state board or the department of education and workforce, any information that a school district board of education is authorized to request under division (F)(2) of this section, and the superintendent of the bureau shall proceed as if the request has been received from a school district board of education under division (F)(2) of this section. (4) When the superintendent of the bureau receives a request for information under section 3319.291 of the Revised Code, the superintendent shall proceed as if the request has been received from a school district board of education and shall comply with divisions (F)(2)(a) and (c) of this section. (G) In addition to or in conjunction with any request that is required to be made under section 3712.09, 3721.121, or 3740.11 of the Revised Code with respect to an individual who has applied for employment in a position that involves providing direct care to an older adult or adult resident, the chief administrator of a home health agency, hospice care program, home licensed under Chapter 3721. of the Revised Code, or adult day-care program operated pursuant to rules adopted under section 3721.04 of the Revised Code may request that the superintendent of the bureau investigate and determine, with respect to any individual who has applied after January 27, 1997, for employment in a position that does not involve providing direct care to an older adult or adult resident, whether the bureau has any information gathered under division (A) of this section that pertains to that individual. In addition to or in conjunction with any request that is required to be made under section 173.27 of the Revised Code with respect to an individual who has applied for employment in a position that involves providing ombudsman services to residents of long-term care facilities or recipients of community-based long-term care services, the state long-term care ombudsman, the director of aging, a regional long-term care ombudsman program, or the designee of the ombudsman, director, or program may request that the superintendent investigate and determine, with respect to any individual who has applied for employment in a position that does not involve providing such ombudsman services, whether the bureau has any information gathered under division (A) of this section that pertains to that applicant. In addition to or in conjunction with any request that is required to be made under section 173.38 of the Revised Code with respect to an individual who has applied for employment in a direct-care position, the chief administrator of a provider, as defined in section 173.39 of the Revised Code, may request that the superintendent investigate and determine, with respect to any individual who has applied for employment in a position that is not a direct-care position, whether the bureau has any information gathered under division (A) of this section that pertains to that applicant. In addition to or in conjunction with any request that is required to be made under section 3712.09 of the Revised Code with respect to an individual who has applied for employment in a position that involves providing direct care to a pediatric respite care patient, the chief administrator of a pediatric respite care program may request that the superintendent of the bureau investigate and determine, with respect to any individual who has applied for employment in a position that does not involve providing direct care to a pediatric respite care patient, whether the bureau has any information gathered under division (A) of this section that pertains to that individual. On receipt of a request under this division, the superintendent shall determine whether that information exists and, on request of the individual requesting information, shall also request from the federal bureau of investigation any criminal records it has pertaining to the applicant. The superintendent or the superintendent's designee also may request criminal history records from other states or the federal government pursuant to the national crime prevention and privacy compact set forth in section 109.571 of the Revised Code. Within thirty days of the date a request is received, subject to division (E)(2) of this section, the superintendent shall send to the requester a report of any information determined to exist, including information contained in records that have been sealed under section 2953.32 of the Revised Code, and, within thirty days of its receipt, shall send the requester a report of any information received from the federal bureau of investigation, other than information the dissemination of which is prohibited by federal law. (H) Information obtained by a government entity or person under this section is confidential and shall not be released or disseminated. (I) The superintendent may charge a reasonable fee for providing information or criminal records under division (F)(2) or (G) of this section. (J) As used in this section: (1) "Pediatric respite care program" and "pediatric care patient" have the same meanings as in section 3712.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Sexually oriented offense" and "child-victim oriented offense" have the same meanings as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school or entity registered with the department of education and workforce under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code to participate in the autism scholarship program or section 3310.58 of the Revised Code to participate in the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program. Sec. 109.573. (A) As used in this section: (1) "DNA" means human deoxyribonucleic acid. (2) "DNA analysis" means a laboratory analysis of a DNA specimen to identify DNA characteristics and to create a DNA record. (3) "DNA database" means a collection of DNA records from forensic casework or from crime scenes, specimens from anonymous and unidentified sources, and records collected pursuant to sections 2152.74 and 2901.07 of the Revised Code and a population statistics database for determining the frequency of occurrence of characteristics in DNA records. (4) "DNA record" means the objective result of a DNA analysis of a DNA specimen, including representations of DNA fragment lengths, digital images of autoradiographs, discrete allele assignment numbers, and other DNA specimen characteristics that aid in establishing the identity of an individual. (5) "DNA specimen" includes human blood cells or physiological tissues or body fluids. (6) "Unidentified person database" means a collection of DNA records, and, on and after May 21, 1998, of fingerprint and photograph records, of unidentified human corpses, human remains, or living individuals. (7) "Relatives of missing persons database" means a collection of DNA records of persons related by consanguinity to a missing person. (8) "Law enforcement agency" means a police department, the office of a sheriff, the state highway patrol, a county prosecuting attorney, or a federal, state, or local governmental body that enforces criminal laws and that has employees who have a statutory power of arrest. (9) "Administration of criminal justice" means the performance of detection, apprehension, detention, pretrial release, post-trial release, prosecution, adjudication, correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders. "Administration of criminal justice" also includes criminal identification activities and the collection, storage, and dissemination of criminal history record information. (B)(1) The superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation may do all of the following: (a) Establish and maintain a state DNA laboratory to perform DNA analyses of DNA specimens; (b) Establish and maintain a DNA database; (c) Establish and maintain an unidentified person database to aid in the establishment of the identity of unknown human corpses, human remains, or living individuals; (d) Establish and maintain a relatives of missing persons database for comparison with the unidentified person database to aid in the establishment of the identity of unknown human corpses, human remains, and living individuals. (2) If the bureau of criminal identification and investigation establishes and maintains a DNA laboratory and a DNA database, the bureau may use or disclose information regarding DNA records for the following purposes: (a) The bureau may disclose information to a law enforcement agency for the administration of criminal justice. (b) The bureau shall disclose pursuant to a court order issued under section 3111.09 of the Revised Code in any action to determine paternity any information necessary to determine the existence of a parent and child relationship in an action brought under sections 3111.01 to 3111.18 of the Revised Code. (c) The bureau may use or disclose information from the population statistics database for identification research and protocol development or for quality control purposes. (3) If the bureau of criminal identification and investigation establishes and maintains a relatives of missing persons database, all of the following apply: (a) If a person has disappeared and has been continuously absent from the person's place of last domicile for a thirty-day or longer period of time without being heard from during the period, persons related by consanguinity to the missing person may submit to the bureau a DNA specimen, the bureau may include the DNA record of the specimen in the relatives of missing persons database, and, if the bureau does not include the DNA record of the specimen in the relatives of missing persons database, the bureau shall retain the DNA record for future reference and inclusion as appropriate in that database. (b) The bureau shall not charge a fee for the submission of a DNA specimen pursuant to division (B)(3)(a) of this section. (c) If the DNA specimen submitted pursuant to division (B)(3)(a) of this section is collected by withdrawing blood from the person or a similarly invasive procedure, a physician, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, duly licensed clinical laboratory technician, or other qualified medical practitioner shall conduct the collection procedure for the DNA specimen submitted pursuant to division (B)(3)(a) of this section and shall collect the DNA specimen in a medically approved manner. If the DNA specimen is collected by swabbing for buccal cells or a similarly noninvasive procedure, division (B)(3)(c) of this section does not require that the DNA specimen be collected by a qualified medical practitioner of that nature. No later than fifteen days after the date of the collection of the DNA specimen, the person conducting the DNA specimen collection procedure shall cause the DNA specimen to be forwarded to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation in accordance with procedures established by the superintendent of the bureau under division (H) of this section. The bureau may provide the specimen vials, mailing tubes, labels, postage, and instruction needed for the collection and forwarding of the DNA specimen to the bureau. (d) The superintendent, in the superintendent's discretion, may compare DNA records in the relatives of missing persons database with the DNA records in the unidentified person database. (4) If the bureau of criminal identification and investigation establishes and maintains an unidentified person database and if the superintendent of the bureau identifies a matching DNA record for the DNA record of a person or deceased person whose DNA record is contained in the unidentified person database, the superintendent shall inform the coroner who submitted or the law enforcement agency that submitted the DNA specimen to the bureau of the match and, if possible, of the identity of the unidentified person. (5) The bureau of criminal identification and investigation may enter into a contract with a qualified public or private laboratory to perform DNA analyses, DNA specimen maintenance, preservation, and storage, DNA record keeping, and other duties required of the bureau under this section. A public or private laboratory under contract with the bureau shall follow quality assurance and privacy requirements established by the superintendent of the bureau. (C) The superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall establish procedures for entering into the DNA database the DNA records submitted pursuant to sections 2152.74 and 2901.07 of the Revised Code and for determining an order of priority for entry of the DNA records based on the types of offenses committed by the persons whose records are submitted and the available resources of the bureau. (D) When a DNA record is derived from a DNA specimen provided pursuant to section 2152.74 or 2901.07 of the Revised Code, the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall attach to the DNA record personal identification information that identifies the person from whom the DNA specimen was taken. The personal identification information may include the subject person's fingerprints and any other information the bureau determines necessary. The DNA record and personal identification information attached to it shall be used only for the purpose of personal identification or for a purpose specified in this section. (E) DNA records, DNA specimens, fingerprints, and photographs that the bureau of criminal identification and investigation receives pursuant to this section and sections 313.08, 2152.74, 2901.07, and 2933.82 of the Revised Code and personal identification information attached to a DNA record are not public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (F) The bureau of criminal identification and investigation may charge a reasonable fee for providing information pursuant to this section to any law enforcement agency located in another state. (G)(1) No person who because of the person's employment or official position has access to a DNA specimen, a DNA record, or other information contained in the DNA database that identifies an individual shall knowingly disclose that specimen, record, or information to any person or agency not entitled to receive it or otherwise shall misuse that specimen, record, or information. (2) No person without authorization or privilege to obtain information contained in the DNA database that identifies an individual person shall purposely obtain that information. (H) The superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall establish procedures for all of the following: (1) The forwarding to the bureau of DNA specimens collected pursuant to division (H) of this section and sections 313.08, 2152.74, 2901.07, and 2933.82 of the Revised Code and of fingerprints and photographs collected pursuant to section 313.08 of the Revised Code; (2) The collection, maintenance, preservation, and analysis of DNA specimens; (3) The creation, maintenance, and operation of the DNA database; (4) The use and dissemination of information from the DNA database; (5) The creation, maintenance, and operation of the unidentified person database; (6) The use and dissemination of information from the unidentified person database; (7) The creation, maintenance, and operation of the relatives of missing persons database; (8) The use and dissemination of information from the relatives of missing persons database; (9) The verification of entities requesting DNA records and other DNA information from the bureau and the authority of the entity to receive the information; (10) The operation of the bureau and responsibilities of employees of the bureau with respect to the activities described in this section. (I) In conducting DNA analyses of DNA specimens, the state DNA laboratory and any laboratory with which the bureau has entered into a contract pursuant to division (B)(5) of this section shall give DNA analyses of DNA specimens that relate to ongoing criminal investigations or prosecutions or that are forwarded by law enforcement agencies pursuant to divisions (B)(2)(a) and (b) of section 2933.82 of the Revised Code priority over DNA analyses of DNA specimens that relate to applications made pursuant to section 2953.73 of the Revised Code. The state DNA laboratory and any laboratory under contract with the bureau to perform DNA analyses shall consider the period of time remaining under section 2901.13 of the Revised Code for commencing the prosecution of a criminal offense related to the DNA specimens as well as other relevant factors in prioritizing DNA analysis of the DNA specimens forwarded by law enforcement agencies pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of section 2933.82 of the Revised Code. (J) The attorney general may develop procedures for entering into the national DNA index system the DNA records submitted pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 2901.07 of the Revised Code. Sec. 109.60. (A)(1)(A)(1)(a) The sheriffs of the several counties and the chiefs of police of cities, immediately upon the arrest of any person for any felony, on suspicion of any felony, for a crime constituting a misdemeanor on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, or for any misdemeanor described in division (A)(1)(a), (A)(8)(a) , or (A)(10)(a) (A)(4)(a), or (A)(6)(a) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, and immediately upon the arrest or taking into custody of any child under eighteen years of age for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult or upon probable cause to believe that a child of that age may have committed an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, shall take the person's or child's fingerprints, or cause the same to be taken, according to the fingerprint system of identification on in the forms furnishedform and manner prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, and immediately shall electronically forward copies of the completed forms in the manner prescribed by the superintendent, any other description that may be required, and the history of the offense committed to the bureau to be classified and filed and submitted to the clerk of the court having jurisdiction over the prosecution of the offense or over the adjudication relative to the act. (b) If a case for a person or child whose fingerprints were taken is sent directly to a grand jury for indictment and no charges are brought, the prosecuting authority to whom the case was referred shall notify the sheriff or chief of police, and the sheriff or chief of police shall notify the bureau that no charges were brought against the person or child. If a case for a person or child is sent directly to a grand jury for indictment and the case proceeds on a direct indictment, the court of common pleas shall order that the person's or child's fingerprints be taken if not previously taken, and the clerk of the court of common pleas shall report the case information and disposition to the bureau. (c) If an offender is convicted of an offense that is required to be reported to the bureau pursuant to section 109.57 of the Revised Code, has not been fingerprinted in connection with the instant case, and is sentenced to a term of community control, the court shall order the offender be fingerprinted as a condition of community control. Upon being fingerprinted, the party responsible for obtaining the offender's fingerprints shall immediately electronically submit copies of the completed forms, any other description that may be required, and the history of the offense committed to the bureau to be classified and filed with the clerk of the court. (2) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, if a person or child has not been arrested and first appears before a court or magistrate in response to a summons, or if a sheriff or chief of police has not taken, or caused to be taken, a person's or child's fingerprints in accordance with division (A)(1) of this section by the time of the arraignment or first appearance of the person or child, the court shall take the person's or child's fingerprints or shall order the person or child to appear before the sheriff or , chief of police, a designee of the sheriff or chief of police, or an individual under the authority of the court and designated by the court to take and submit fingerprints, within twenty-four hours to have the person's or child's fingerprints taken. The sheriff or, chief of police, or other designated individual shall take the person's or child's fingerprints, or cause the fingerprints to be taken, according to the fingerprint system of identification on in the forms furnishedform and manner prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation and, immediately after the person's or child's arraignment or first appearance, electronically forward copies of the completed forms in the manner prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau, any other description that may be required, and the history of the offense committed to the bureau to be classified and filed and to the clerk of the court. (3) Every court with jurisdiction over a case involving a person or child with respect to whom division (A)(1) or (2) of this section requires a sheriff or chief of police to take the person's or child's fingerprints to be taken shall inquire, at or before the time of the person's or child's sentencing or adjudication, verify or cause to be verified through a reliable electronic records system whether or not the person or child has been fingerprinted pursuant to division (A)(1) or (2) of this section for the original arrest or court appearance upon which the sentence or adjudication is based. If the person or child was not fingerprinted for the original arrest or court appearance upon which the sentence or adjudication is based, the court shall take the person's or child's fingerprints or shall order the person or child to appear before the sheriff or, chief of police within twenty-four hours, a designee of the sheriff or chief of police, or an individual under the authority of the court and designated by the court to take and submit fingerprints to have the person's or child's fingerprints taken at any time before sentencing or adjudication. If the person or child has not been fingerprinted prior to sentencing or adjudication, the court shall continue the proceeding for the time required for the court to obtain the fingerprints. If the court orders the person or child to appear before the sheriff or chief of police to have the person's or child's fingerprints taken, the sheriff or chief of police shall take the person's or child's fingerprints, or cause the fingerprints to be taken, according to the fingerprint system of identification on in the forms furnished form and manner prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation and immediately electronically forward copies of the completed forms in the manner prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau, any other description that may be required, and the history of the offense committed to the bureau to be classified and filed and to the clerk of the court. The sheriff, chief of police, a designee of the sheriff or chief of police, or other individual under the authority of the court and designated by the court to take fingerprints shall take the person's or child's fingerprints, or cause the fingerprints to be taken, immediately upon being presented with the court order requiring fingerprints to be taken and provide those fingerprints to the court and bureau as described above. (4) If a person or child is in the custody of a law enforcement agency or a detention facility, as defined in section 2921.01 of the Revised Code, and the chief law enforcement officer or chief administrative officer of the detention facility discovers that a warrant has been issued or a bill of information, indictment, or complaint, including offenses that occur while the person or child is in detention, has been filed alleging the person or child to have committed an offense or act other than the offense or act for which the person or child is in custody, and the other alleged offense or act is one for which fingerprints are to be taken pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section, the law enforcement agency or detention facility shall take the fingerprints of the person or child, or cause the fingerprints to be taken, according to the fingerprint system of identification on in the forms furnished form and manner prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation and immediately electronically forward copies of the completed forms in the manner prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau, any other description that may be required, and the history of the offense committed to the bureau to be classified and filed and to the clerk of the court that issued the warrant, indictment, or complaint, or with which the bill of information was filed, and submit to the clerk of the court hearing the case, if different from the issuing court. (5)(5)(a) If an accused is found not guilty of the offense charged or a nolle prosequi is entered in any case, or if any accused child under eighteen years of age is found not to be a delinquent child for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult or not guilty of the felony or offense of violence charged or a nolle prosequi is entered in that case, the fingerprints and description shall be given to the accused upon the accused's request. (b) If no charges are filed or a person is otherwise released or dismissed after being fingerprinted and those fingerprints have been forwarded to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, the sheriffs of the several counties and the chiefs of police of cities shall notify the bureau that no charges were filed or the person was otherwise released and the bureau shall note that status in connection to the fingerprint record. (c) If, after a person or child is arrested and fingerprinted for a criminal offense no indictment is returned, bill of information is filed, or charges are filed by the prosecuting authority to whom the case was referred, the prosecuting authority to whom the case was referred shall notify the law enforcement agency that referred the case that no charges are forthcoming at this time, the sheriff or chief of police shall notify the bureau of the case status, and the bureau shall note that status in connection to the fingerprint record. (6) The superintendent shall compare the description received with those already on file in the bureau, and, if the superintendent finds that the person arrested or taken into custody has a criminal record or a record as a delinquent child for having committed an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult or is a fugitive from justice or wanted by any jurisdiction in this or another state, the United States, or a foreign country for any offense, the superintendent at once shall inform the arresting officer, the officer taking the person into custody, or the chief administrative officer of the county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, community-based correctional facility, halfway house, alternative residential facility, or state correctional institution in which the person or child is in custody of that fact and give appropriate notice to the proper authorities in the jurisdiction in which the person is wanted, or, if that jurisdiction is a foreign country, give appropriate notice to federal authorities for transmission to the foreign country. The names, under which each person whose identification is filed is known, shall be alphabetically indexed by the superintendent. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to a violator of a city ordinance unless the officers have reason to believe that the violator is a past offender or the crime is one constituting a misdemeanor on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, or unless it is advisable for the purpose of subsequent identification. This section does not apply to any child under eighteen years of age who was not arrested or otherwise taken into custody for committing an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult or upon probable cause to believe that a child of that age may have committed an act that would be a felony or an offense of violence if committed by an adult, except as provided in section 2151.313 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) For purposes of division (C) of this section, a law enforcement agency shall be considered to have arrested a person if any law enforcement officer who is employed by, appointed by, or serves that agency arrests the person. As used in division (C) of this section: (a) "Illegal methamphetamine manufacturing laboratory" has the same meaning as in section 3745.13 of the Revised Code. (b) "Methamphetamine or a methamphetamine product" means methamphetamine, any salt, isomer, or salt of an isomer of methamphetamine, or any compound, mixture, preparation, or substance containing methamphetamine or any salt, isomer, or salt of an isomer of methamphetamine. (2) Each law enforcement agency that, in any calendar year, arrests any person for a violation of section 2925.04 of the Revised Code that is based on the manufacture of methamphetamine or a methamphetamine product, a violation of section 2925.041 of the Revised Code that is based on the possession of chemicals sufficient to produce methamphetamine or a methamphetamine product, or a violation of any other provision of Chapter 2925. or 3719. of the Revised Code that is based on the possession of chemicals sufficient to produce methamphetamine or a methamphetamine product shall prepare an annual report covering the calendar year that contains the information specified in division (C)(3) of this section relative to all arrests for violations of those sections committed under those circumstances during that calendar year and relative to illegal methamphetamine manufacturing laboratories, dump sites, and chemical caches as specified in that division and shall send the annual report, not later than the first day of March in the calendar year following the calendar year covered by the report, to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. The law enforcement agency shall write any annual report prepared and filed under this division on in the standard forms furnished form and manner prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation pursuant to division (C)(4) of this section. The annual report shall be a statistical report, and nothing in the report or in the information it contains shall identify, or enable the identification of, any person who was arrested and whose arrest is included in the information contained in the report. The annual report in the possession of the bureau and the information it contains are public records for the purpose of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (3) The annual report prepared and filed by a law enforcement agency under division (C)(2) of this section shall contain all of the following information for the calendar year covered by the report: (a) The total number of arrests made by the agency in that calendar year for a violation of section 2925.04 of the Revised Code that is based on the manufacture of methamphetamine or a methamphetamine product, a violation of section 2925.041 of the Revised Code that is based on the possession of chemicals sufficient to produce methamphetamine or a methamphetamine product, or a violation of any other provision of Chapter 2925. or 3719. of the Revised Code that is based on the possession of chemicals sufficient to produce methamphetamine or a methamphetamine product; (b) The total number of illegal methamphetamine manufacturing laboratories at which one or more of the arrests reported under division (C)(3)(a) of this section occurred, or that were discovered in that calendar year within the territory served by the agency but at which none of the arrests reported under division (C)(3)(a) of this section occurred; (c) The total number of dump sites and chemical caches that are, or that are reasonably believed to be, related to illegal methamphetamine manufacturing and that were discovered in that calendar year within the territory served by the agency. (4) The superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall prepare and furnish to each law enforcement agency in this state standard forms for making the annual reports required by division (C)(2) of this section. The standard forms that the superintendent prepares pursuant to this division may be in a tangible format, in an electronic format, or in both a tangible format and an electronic format. (5) The annual report required by division (C)(2) of this section is separate from, and in addition to, any report, materials, or information required under division (A) of this section or under any other provision of sections 109.57 to 109.62 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2953.32. (A)(1) Sections 2953.32 and 2953.34 of the Revised Code do not apply to any of the following: (a) Convictions under Chapter 4506., 4507., 4510., 4511., or 4549. of the Revised Code, or a conviction for a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to any section contained in any of those chapters; (b) Convictions of a felony offense of violence that is not a sexually oriented offense; (c) Convictions of a sexually oriented offense when the offender is subject to the requirements of Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code or Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code as it existed prior to January 1, 2008; (d) Convictions of an offense in circumstances in which the victim of the offense was less than thirteen years of age, except for convictions under section 2919.21 of the Revised Code; (e) Convictions for a violation of section 2921.41 of the Revised Code; (f) Convictions of a felony of the first or second degree; (g) Convictions for a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code that is a misdemeanor of the first or second degree or convictions for a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to that section; (h) Convictions of a felony of the third degree if the offender has more than one other conviction of any felony or, if the person has exactly two convictions of a felony of the third degree, has more convictions in total than those two third degree felony convictions and two misdemeanor convictions. (2) Sections 2953.32 to 2953.34 of the Revised Code apply to the following for purposes of sealing, but not for purposes of expungement of the record of the case: (a) Convictions for a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code that is a misdemeanor of the third or fourth degree or convictions for a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to that section; (b) Convictions for a violation of section 2919.27 of the Revised Code or convictions for a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to that section. (3) For purposes of division (A)(1)(h) of this section, both of the following apply: (a) When two or more convictions result from or are connected with the same act or result from offenses committed at the same time, they shall be counted as one conviction. (b) When two or three convictions result from the same indictment, information, or complaint, from the same plea of guilty, or from the same official proceeding, and result from related criminal acts that were committed within a three-month period but do not result from the same act or from offenses committed at the same time, they shall be counted as one conviction, provided that a court may decide as provided in division (D)(1)(i) of this section that it is not in the public interest for the two or three convictions to be counted as one conviction. (B)(1) Except as provided in section 2953.61 of the Revised Code or as otherwise provided in division (B)(1)(a)(iii) of this section, an eligible offender may apply to the sentencing court if convicted in this state, or to a court of common pleas if convicted in another state or in a federal court, for the sealing or expungement of the record of the case that pertains to the conviction, except for convictions listed in division (A)(1) of this section. Application may be made at whichever of the following times is applicable regarding the offense: (a) An application for sealing under this section may be made at whichever of the following times is applicable regarding the offense: (i) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(1)(a)(iv) of this section, at the expiration of three years after the offender's final discharge if convicted of one or two felonies of the third degree, so long as none of the offenses is a violation of section 2921.43 of the Revised Code; (ii) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(1)(a)(iv) of this section, at the expiration of one year after the offender's final discharge if convicted of one or more felonies of the fourth or fifth degree or one or more misdemeanors, so long as none of the offenses is a violation of section 2921.43 of the Revised Code or a felony offense of violence; (iii) At the expiration of seven years after the offender's final discharge if the record includes one or more convictions of soliciting improper compensation in violation of section 2921.43 of the Revised Code; (iv) If the offender was subject to the requirements of Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code or Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code as it existed prior to January 1, 2008, at the expiration of five years after the requirements have ended under section 2950.07 of the Revised Code or section 2950.07 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to January 1, 2008, or are terminated under section 2950.15 or 2950.151 of the Revised Code; (v) At the expiration of six months after the offender's final discharge if convicted of a minor misdemeanor. (b) An application for expungement under this section may be made at whichever of the following times is applicable regarding the offense: (i) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(1)(b)(ii) of this section, if the offense is a misdemeanor, at the expiration of one year after the offender's final discharge; (ii) If the offense is a minor misdemeanor, at the expiration of six months after the offender's final discharge; (iii) If the offense is a felony, at the expiration of ten years after the time specified in division (B)(1)(a) of this section at which the person may file an application for sealing with respect to that felony offense. (2) Any person who has been arrested for any misdemeanor offense and who has effected a bail forfeiture for the offense charged may apply to the court in which the misdemeanor criminal case was pending when bail was forfeited for the sealing or expungement of the record of the case that pertains to the charge. Except as provided in section 2953.61 of the Revised Code, the application may be filed at whichever of the following times is applicable regarding the offense: (a) An application for sealing under this section may be made at any time after the date on which the bail forfeiture was entered upon the minutes of the court or the journal, whichever entry occurs first. (b) An application for expungement under this section may be made at whichever of the following times is applicable regarding the offense: (i) Except as provided in division (B)(2)(b)(ii) of this section, at any time after the expiration of one year from the date on which the bail forfeiture was entered upon the minutes of the court or the journal, whichever entry occurs first; (ii) If the offense is a minor misdemeanor, at any time after the expiration of six months from the date on which the bail forfeiture was entered upon the minutes of the court or the journal, whichever entry occurs first. (C) Upon the filing of an application under this section, the court shall set a date for a hearing and shall notify the prosecutor for the case of the hearing on the application not less than sixty days prior to the hearing. Pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, the prosecutor shall provide timely notice of the application and the date and time of the hearing to a victim and victim's representative, if applicable, if the victim or victim's representative requested notice of the proceedings in the underlying case. The court shall hold the hearing not less than forty-five days and not more than ninety days from the date of the filing of the application, unless the delay is caused by the applicant. The prosecutor may object to the granting of the application by filing a written objection with the court not later than thirty days prior to the date set for the hearing. The prosecutor shall specify in the objection the reasons for believing a denial of the application is justified. The victim, victim's representative, and victim's attorney, if applicable, may be present and heard orally, in writing, or both at any hearing under this section. The court shall direct its regular probation officer, a state probation officer, or the department of probation of the county in which the applicant resides to make inquiries and written reports as the court requires concerning the applicant. The probation officer or county department of probation that the court directs to make inquiries and written reports as the court requires concerning the applicant shall determine whether or not the applicant was fingerprinted at the time of arrest or under section 109.60 of the Revised Code. If the applicant was so fingerprinted, the probation officer or county department of probation shall include with the written report a record of the applicant's fingerprints. If the applicant was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (A)(2) or (B) of section 2919.21 of the Revised Code, the probation officer or county department of probation that the court directed to make inquiries concerning the applicant shall contact the child support enforcement agency enforcing the applicant's obligations under the child support order to inquire about the offender's compliance with the child support order. (D)(1) At the hearing held under division (C) of this section, the court shall do each of the following: (a) Determine whether the applicant is pursuing sealing or expunging a conviction of an offense that is prohibited under division (A) of this section or whether the forfeiture of bail was agreed to by the applicant and the prosecutor in the case, and determine whether the application was made at the time specified in division (B)(1)(a) or (b) or division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section that is applicable with respect to the application and the subject offense; (b) Determine whether criminal proceedings are pending against the applicant; (c) Determine whether the applicant has been rehabilitated to the satisfaction of the court; (d) If the prosecutor has filed an objection in accordance with division (C) of this section, consider the reasons against granting the application specified by the prosecutor in the objection; (e) If the victim objected, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, consider the reasons against granting the application specified by the victim in the objection; (f) Weigh the interests of the applicant in having the records pertaining to the applicant's conviction or bail forfeiture sealed or expunged against the legitimate needs, if any, of the government to maintain those records; (g) Consider the oral or written statement of any victim, victim's representative, and victim's attorney, if applicable; (h) If the applicant was an eligible offender of the type described in division (A)(3) of section 2953.36 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to April 4, 2023, determine whether the offender has been rehabilitated to a satisfactory degree. In making the determination, the court may consider all of the following: (i) The age of the offender; (ii) The facts and circumstances of the offense; (iii) The cessation or continuation of criminal behavior; (iv) The education and employment of the offender; (v) Any other circumstances that may relate to the offender's rehabilitation. (i) If the court is required to determine whether an applicant for sealing or expungement has two or three convictions that result from the same indictment, information, or complaint, from the same plea of guilty, or from the same official proceeding, and result from related criminal acts that were committed within a three-month period but do not result from the same act or from offenses committed at the same time, in making its determination, the court initially shall determine whether it is not in the public interest for the two or three convictions to be counted as one conviction. If the court determines that it is not in the public interest for the two or three convictions to be counted as one conviction, the court shall determine whether, when counting the convictions individually, the applicant is pursuing sealing or expunging a conviction that is prohibited under division (A) of this section. (2) If the court determines, after complying with division (D)(1) of this section, that the offender is not pursuing sealing or expunging a conviction of an offense that is prohibited under division (A) of this section or that the forfeiture of bail was agreed to by the applicant and the prosecutor in the case, that the application was made at the time specified in division (B)(1)(a) or (b) or division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section that is applicable with respect to the application and the subject offense, that no criminal proceeding is pending against the applicant, that the interests of the applicant in having the records pertaining to the applicant's conviction or bail forfeiture sealed or expunged are not outweighed by any legitimate governmental needs to maintain those records, and that the rehabilitation of the applicant has been attained to the satisfaction of the court, both of the following apply: (a) The court, except as provided in division (D)(4) or (5) of this section or division (D), (F), or (G) of section 2953.34 of the Revised Code, shall order all official records of the case that pertain to the conviction or bail forfeiture sealed if the application was for sealing or expunged if the application was for expungement and, except as provided in division (C) of section 2953.34 of the Revised Code, all index references to the case that pertain to the conviction or bail forfeiture deleted and, in the case of bail forfeitures, shall dismiss the charges in the case. (b) The proceedings in the case that pertain to the conviction or bail forfeiture shall be considered not to have occurred and the conviction or bail forfeiture of the person who is the subject of the proceedings shall be sealed if the application was for sealing or expunged if the application was for expungement, except that upon conviction of a subsequent offense, a sealed record of prior conviction or bail forfeiture may be considered by the court in determining the sentence or other appropriate disposition, including the relief provided for in sections 2953.31, 2953.32, and 2953.34 of the Revised Code. (3) An applicant may request the sealing or expungement of the records of more than one case in a single application under this section. Upon the filing of an application under this section, the applicant, unless the applicant presents a poverty affidavit showing that the applicant is indigent, shall pay an application fee of fifty dollars and may pay a local court fee of not more than fifty dollars, regardless of the number of records the application requests to have sealed or expunged. If the applicant pays a fee, the court shall pay three-fifths of the fee collected into the state treasury, with half of that amount credited to the attorney general reimbursement fund created by section 109.11 of the Revised Code. If the applicant pays a fee, the court shall pay two-fifths of the fee collected into the county general revenue fund if the sealed or expunged conviction or bail forfeiture was pursuant to a state statute, or into the general revenue fund of the municipal corporation involved if the sealed or expunged conviction or bail forfeiture was pursuant to a municipal ordinance. (4) If the court orders the official records pertaining to the case sealed or expunged, the court shall do one of the following: (a) If the applicant was fingerprinted at the time of arrest or under section 109.60 of the Revised Code and the record of the applicant's fingerprints was provided to the court under division (C) of this section, forward a copy of the sealing or expungement order and the record of the applicant's fingerprints to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. (b) If the applicant was not fingerprinted at the time of arrest or under section 109.60 of the Revised Code, or the record of the applicant's fingerprints was not provided to the court under division (C) of this section, but fingerprinting was required for the offense, take the applicant's fingerprints or order the applicant to appear before a sheriff or a chief of police to have the applicant's fingerprints taken, prior to the record sealing, according to the fingerprint system of identification on in the forms furnished form and manner prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. The sheriff shall forward the applicant's fingerprints to the court. The court shall forward the applicant's fingerprints and a copy of the sealing or expungement order to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. Failure of the court to order fingerprints at the time of sealing or expungement does not constitute a reversible error. (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, when the bureau of criminal identification and investigation receives notice from a court that the record of a conviction or bail forfeiture has been expunged under this section, the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall maintain a record of the expunged conviction record for the limited purpose of determining an individual's qualification or disqualification for employment in law enforcement. The bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall not be compelled by the court to destroy, delete, or erase those records so that the records are permanently irretrievable. These records may only be disclosed or provided to law enforcement for the limited purpose of determining an individual's qualification or disqualification for employment in law enforcement. When any other entity other than the bureau of criminal identification and investigation receives notice from a court that the record of a conviction or bail forfeiture has been expunged under this section, the entity shall destroy, delete, and erase the record as appropriate for the record's physical or electronic form or characteristic so that the record is permanently irretrievable. Sec. 5122.311. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, if, on or after April 8, 2004, an individual is found by a court to be a person with a mental illness subject to court order or becomes an involuntary patient other than one who is a patient only for purposes of observation, the probate judge who made the adjudication or the chief clinical officer of the hospital, community mental health services provider, or facility in which the person is an involuntary patient shall notify the office of the attorney general, on the form in the manner described in division (C) of this section, of the identity of the individual. The notification shall be transmitted by the judge or the chief clinical officer not later than seven days after the adjudication or commitment. (B) The office of the attorney general shall compile and maintain the notices it receives under division (A) of this section and the notices shall be used for the purpose of conducting incompetency records checks pursuant to section 311.41 of the Revised Code. The notices and the information they contain are confidential, except as provided in this division, and are not public records. (C) The attorney general, by rule adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall prescribe and make available to all probate judges and all chief clinical officers a form to be used by them for the purpose of the form and manner for making the notifications required by division (A) of this section. Section 2. That existing sections 109.57, 109.573, 109.60, 2953.32, and 5122.311 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That Section 221.40 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 434 of the 136th General Assembly) be amended to read as follows: Sec. 221.40. OHIO COURTS TECHNOLOGY INITIATIVE Of the foregoing appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses, $3,350,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to fund an initiative by the Attorney General to facilitate the exchange of information and warehousing of data by and between Ohio courts and other justice system partners through the delivery of technology services to courts throughout the state, including the provision of hardware, and software, and the development and implementation of educational and training programs for judges and court personnel. Courts of record and the clerks of the each court of common pleas, whether elected or appointed, located in counties with a population of not more than 125,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census, are eligible for to receive funding under the initiative. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall cancel any existing encumbrances, at the request of the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court of Ohio and the Attorney General, or their designees, against appropriation item 005409, Ohio Courts Technology Initiative, used by the Supreme Court of Ohio, and reestablish them against appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses. The reestablished encumbrance amounts are hereby appropriated. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court of Ohio and the Attorney General, or their designees, shall facilitate the transfer of management and administration of any outstanding grants and all necessary program records or files from the Supreme Court to the Attorney General. Section 4. That existing Section 221.40 of H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 434 of the 136th General Assembly) is hereby repealed.